Utah statutes.
78A-5-202.   Creation of Drug Board Pilot Project -- Definition of Drug Board Pilot Project -- Criteria for parolee participation in the Drug Board Pilot Project -- Reporting requirements.

(1)  There may be created a Drug Board Pilot Project in Davis and Weber counties that includes intensive substance abuse treatment, frequent drug testing, and other additional conditions of parole, with the expectation that the offender will be required to complete the substance abuse treatment, remain drug free, and meet all other conditions of parole.

(2)  Screening criteria for parolee participation in the Drug Board Pilot Project shall:

(a)  be determined by the Board of Pardons and Parole and the Department of Corrections; and

(b)  include parolees who are facing an eminent return to prison due to substance abuse.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

